Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 1

Establishment and Operation of Board

9-8-101. Board established — Membership — Chair — Claims not within jurisdiction.

A board of claims whose membership is composed of the commissioner of human resources or such commissioner's designee, the commissioner of finance and administration or such commissioner's designee, the state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, and the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee is hereby established.

The state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee shall be the ex officio chair of the board of claims.

Claims arising after January 1, 1985, that do not fall within the jurisdiction of the claims commission may only be paid after approval by the principals of the board of claims.

Acts 1945, ch. 73, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1034.1 (Williams, § 1034.26); Acts 1951, ch. 39, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, §§ 3, 14; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1979, ch. 184, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-801; Acts 1981, ch. 154, § 1; 1985, ch. 105, § 12; 1997, ch. 34, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The board of claims, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

Pursuant to Acts 2007, ch. 60, references to the department of personnel were changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

Cross-References. Levee or drainage district filing petition with board of claims, §69-5-314.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., State, § 14.

Law Reviews.

Handling Tort Claims Against the State of Tennessee (Lewis L. Laska), 23 Tenn. B.J. 26 (1987).

Moving to Comparative Negligence in an Era of Tort Reform: Decisions for Tennessee (Carol A. Mutter), 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 199 (1990).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Torts — Hurd v. Woolfork: The Public Duty Doctrine in Tennessee, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1279 (1998).

9-8-102. Board attached to department of the treasury — Secretary.

For the purpose of administration, including fiscal and personnel operations, the board is attached to the department of the treasury.

The chair has the authority to designate an employee of the department of the treasury as secretary to the board of claims, who will keep the records and minutes of the board and perform other administrative tasks as assigned by the board.

Acts 1945, ch. 73, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 1034.6 (Williams, § 1034.31); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(45); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-802; Acts 1981, ch. 154, § 2; 1986, ch. 626, § 4.

9-8-103 — 9-8-106. [Reserved.]

The functions and responsibilities of the defense counsel commission arising out of incidents occurring after January 1, 1985, are hereby transferred to the board of claims. The board may establish procedures and rules under which these functions and responsibilities may be carried out by a subcommittee of the board. The defense counsel commission shall retain jurisdiction over all requests for counsel and compensation arising out of incidents occurring before January 1, 1985.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1985, ch. 166, § 1 terminated the defense counsel commission effective April 18, 1985, but continued it for the purposes mandated by this section.

9-8-108. Powers and duties.

The board of claims:

Has the authority, but is not required, to investigate and hear claims and make awards when appropriate in cases based on acts or omissions of state officers or employees where a claim does not fall within the jurisdiction of the claims commission under § 9-8-307(a). The board of claims shall not have jurisdiction over any claim arising under § 9-8-307(a), even though the claimant requests punitive damages and/or damages in excess of those set forth in § 9-8-307(e). No award shall be made unless the board determines that the facts would entitle the claimant to a judgment in action at law. Where the board determines to hear a claim, it may refer the claim to a designee for a hearing and written recommendation to the board on whether or not to make an award. If the recommendation by the designee is against an award or less than the amount requested by the claimant, the claimant shall have the right to an appeal to the board. The board may, in its discretion, hold a hearing or decide the claim on the record. All decisions of the board shall be final;

Is authorized to pay final judgments in civil lawsuits against state employees as provided in § 9-8-112;

Shall review and make recommendations to the commissioner of finance and administration and the general assembly regarding the following:

The required funding of the risk management fund;

The required funding of the claims commission administrative costs; and

Appropriate levels of self-insurance, purchased insurance or any combination thereof for the protection of the state and/or its employees and the required funding for such insurance policies. The recommendation made by the board of claims to the general assembly for excess coverage for the ensuing calendar year pursuant to § 9-8-307(e) may include self-insurance, purchased insurance or any combination of the two (2);

Shall review and approve insurance policies designed to pay claims against the state or its employees arising from contract or tort. This responsibility includes the authority to coordinate the purchase of insurance between the various departments, agencies, and institutions, and all other entities created by the state other than counties and municipal corporations in order that adequate protection be given at the least possible cost;

Has jurisdiction to hear disputes between the various departments and agencies of the state involving the assignment of losses to individual departments, as well as general responsibility to establish policies governing the administration of the state's contract and tort insurance program;

Shall retain consultants as necessary to fully discharge the duties assigned to the board;

Shall hear claims for compensation by persons wrongfully imprisoned and granted exoneration pursuant to § 40-27-109. Any award made by the board pursuant to this subdivision (a)(7) shall be subject to the following conditions:

Compensation payable to such persons shall be determined by the board considering all factors the board considers relevant including, but not limited to, the person's physical and mental suffering and loss of earnings; provided, however, that the maximum aggregate total of such compensation shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000);

Any amount awarded shall be payable in equal monthly installments until paid in full, unless the person dies prior to receipt of the full amount. The amount of the monthly installments payable under this subdivision (a)(7) shall be calculated by dividing the noncommuted amount, determined pursuant to subdivision (a)(7)(D), by the estimated number of months the claimant will live based upon the claimant's life expectancy at the time of the award as determined from the mortality tables last adopted by the board of trustees of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system pursuant to § 8-34-503, or based on such shorter period of time as the board, in its discretion, determines appropriate;

If the person dies without leaving a surviving spouse or surviving minor children, the payments shall cease. Upon the death of the claimant, any monthly installments left remaining shall be paid to the claimant's surviving spouse and surviving minor children in equal portions. The amount payable to the surviving spouse, if any, shall be paid until the surviving spouse's death or remarriage. If the surviving spouse dies or remarries, then the amount that was payable to the surviving spouse shall be divided equally among the claimant's surviving minor children. Each child shall receive such child's share until reaching majority status or death, whichever occurs first, at which time the amount shall be redistributed equally among the remaining minor children. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(7)(C), “minor” means any person who has not attained eighteen (18) years of age;

Upon motion of the claimant or in the discretion of the board, all or a portion of the compensation payable monthly under this subdivision (a)(7) may be commuted to a lump sum payment. In determining whether to commute the compensation, the board shall consider whether there exist special needs warranting such commutation, whether the commutation will be in the best interest of the person and whether that person has the ability to wisely manage and control the commuted award irrespective of whether there exist special needs. The claimant has the burden of proving that a lump sum payment is warranted;

In the event compensation is awarded to a claimant pursuant to this subdivision (a)(7), the board, at the request of the claimant, may fund on behalf of such claimant an annuity contract to be secured by the claimant; provided, however, that:

Such contract shall only be secured from an insurance company licensed under the laws of this state whose claims paying ability is rated as superior or excellent by at least two (2) nationally recognized rating services;

The contract, by its terms, cannot be sold, transferred, assigned, discounted or used as security for a loan; and

The contract provides for survivor benefits;

The cost of any such annuity contract shall be paid from the compensation awarded to the claimant under this subdivision (a)(7);

Any claim for compensation under this subdivision (a)(7) must be filed with the board no later than one (1) year from the date that the claimant is granted exoneration pursuant to § 40-27-109;

The state of Tennessee shall have a right of subrogation as provided by law for any amount awarded pursuant to this subdivision (a)(7) against any person who willfully and intentionally committed an act or engaged in conduct that directly resulted in or contributed to the wrongful conviction and imprisonment of the claimant; and

Any claimant awarded compensation pursuant to this subdivision (a)(7) that did not involve the funding of an annuity contract pursuant to subdivision (a)(7)(E) may, after three (3) years from the initial award and once every three-year period thereafter, file a petition with the board requesting the board to:

Reconsider the period of time over which the monthly installments shall be paid;

Commute to a lump sum payment all or a portion of the compensation left remaining to be paid monthly under subdivision (a)(7)(B); or

Both subdivisions (a)(7)(H)(i)(a ) and (b );

In determining whether to grant all or any portion of the claimant’s request, the board shall consider whether there exists special needs warranting the request, whether the granting of the request will be in the best interest of the claimant and, if the request involves a commutation to a lump sum, whether the claimant has the ability to wisely manage and control the commuted amount irrespective of whether there exists special needs. The claimant has the burden of proving that the request is warranted;

Shall certify the per occurrence limit to the claims commission;

Has the authority to hear claims and make awards for property damage caused by an escapee from a state correctional facility; provided, that:

The claimant has the burden of proving that the escapee caused the damage, that the proximate cause of the escape was the negligence of a state employee, that the incident giving rise to the loss occurred in the county in which the escape occurred or in a county contiguous to the county in which the escape occurred, that the damage occurred within seventy-two (72) hours of the escape and that the amount requested is not reimbursable from any other source;

No award shall be paid if the state correctional facility from which the individual causing such damage escaped is classified as a community service center, a work release center or a nonsecured juvenile facility;

No award shall be paid to any individual who aided in the escape of the inmate causing such damage;

For purposes of this subdivision (a)(9), negligence shall exist when an employee of the department of correction is disciplined as a result of acts or omissions related to the occurrence of escape; and

Claim awards are limited to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per claimant;

Is authorized to establish incentive programs for state departments, agencies and institutions, including public institutions of higher education, for the purpose of reducing liabilities to the risk management fund created pursuant to § 9-8-109. Such incentive programs may include, but are not limited to, differential premium rates based on participation in loss control programs established by the board of claims, increased or decreased deductibles based on participation in loss control programs established by the board, and the imposition of fines and penalties. Any such premiums, deductibles, fines, or penalties shall be paid from the budget of the respective department, agency or institution and deposited into the risk management fund; and

Is authorized to adopt and publish rules and regulations necessary for the proper performance of its duties.

The board of claims may not consider a claim filed more than one (1) year after the occurrence of the incident giving rise to the claim.

Prior to the acquisition of any commercial grade motor vehicle that is to be used primarily for transporting nonstudents by any state department, agency, or institution, including any public institution of higher education, such department, agency or institution shall procure bids for obtaining appropriate levels of insurance on such motor vehicle as shall be determined by the board of claims. This subsection (c) shall only apply to commercial grade motor vehicles that are intended to be used ten percent (10%) or more of the time for travel outside this state. The board of claims shall determine by policy the type motor vehicles that shall be considered commercial grade motor vehicles for purposes of this subsection (c). The department, agency or institution shall maintain such insurance coverage during the time the department, agency or institution owns the motor vehicle. The board of claims is authorized, at its discretion, to review and approve the insurance company from which the insurance shall be procured, the amount of the premiums and the period of the insurance policy. For purposes of this section, “acquisition” means by purchase, devise, gift or otherwise.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 16; 1986, ch. 626, § 6; 1986, ch. 911, § 5; 1988, ch. 467, § 1; 1988, ch. 701, § 1; 2003, ch. 212, § 4; 2004, ch. 880, § 1; 2010, ch. 946, § 1; 2010, ch. 993, § 1; 2012, ch. 1055, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 164, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Exclusiveness of an Employee's Workers' Compensation Remedy Against His Employer (Joseph H. King, Jr.), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 405 (1988).

9-8-109. Risk management fund.

A risk management fund shall be established as a separate account in the state treasury. Amounts remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. Moneys in the risk management fund shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to chapter 4, part 6 of this title, for the sole benefit of that fund.

The board of claims shall recommend annually to the commissioner of finance and administration the total occurrence basis funding required to satisfy the liabilities arising under this chapter, the liabilities arising under title 12, chapter 3, part 9 and the contribution required of each state department, agency and institution, including higher education, needed to achieve the required funding.

The claims commission shall forward to the division of claims and risk management all of its decisions after they become final. The division of claims and risk management shall pay all claims for which the state is liable after the decision becomes final. Claim awards from the commission or the board of claims, as well as settlements, shall be paid only from funds appropriated or reserved for that purpose. There is hereby appropriated a sum sufficient to the risk management fund for the purpose of paying claims; provided, that awards made pursuant to actions founded upon express contract or breach thereof or awards made for the recovery of taxes shall not be paid from the risk management fund, but instead shall be paid from other funds in accordance with procedures established by the board of claims and approved by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Expenses payable from the risk management fund shall include those attributable to: defending state employees pursuant to title 8, chapter 42, part 1; defending the state pursuant to part 3 of this chapter; the division of claims and risk management; the Tennessee claims commission; the department of the treasury's casualty risk program; and expenses and losses arising pursuant to title 12, chapter 3, part 9. The expenses pursuant to this subsection (d) are subject to annual appropriations and chapter 4, part 51 of this title. Subsequent to the close of each fiscal year, the attorney general and reporter shall provide to the state board of claims a report describing the manner in which funds received from the risk management fund were used in defending actions brought against the state and its employees.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 17; 1985, ch. 105, § 17; 1995, ch. 260, § 1; 2003, ch. 212, §§ 1-3, 8; 2004, ch. 448, § 1; 2017, ch. 271, § 1.

9-8-110. Division of claims and risk management.

The state treasurer shall administer a division of claims and risk management to compile information and administer risk management programs. This division shall serve as staff to the board of claims in matters relating to casualty risk.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 18; 1994, ch. 669, § 3; 2017, ch. 271, § 2.

9-8-111. Compensation for loss, damage or destruction of personal property.

The state shall compensate state employees for the loss, damage or destruction of personal property which is not otherwise compensable which occurs in the course of employment and which is required by the state to be used in the course of employment.

For purposes of this section, a motor vehicle shall be considered required by the state to be used in the course of employment only if:

The employee was reimbursed for mileage by the state for use of such motor vehicle at the time of the incident giving rise to the claim; or

The employee was authorized to use a rental motor vehicle paid for by the state at the time of the incident giving rise to the claim.

The requirement that the employee's personal property be required by the state to be used in the course of employment shall be waived if:

The loss, damage or destruction resulted from an assault and battery upon the state employee;

The loss, damage or destruction occurred while the employee was performing duties outside the normal scope of such employee's employment at the direction of an immediate supervisor; or

The loss, damage or destruction occurred as a result of a special hazard of the employee's employment which is not encountered by the general public.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the state shall not compensate state employees for the loss, damage or destruction of personal property if:

The loss, damage or destruction resulted from an act of God or natural disaster;

The loss, damage or destruction of personal property which is not a motor vehicle resulted from the employee's negligence;

The loss, damage or destruction of personal property which is a motor vehicle resulted from the employee's gross negligence; or

The loss, damage or destruction represents normal wear and tear of personal property.

In cases where the employee has the benefit of insurance coverage for the personal property, the employee shall not be compensated by the state unless the employee has attempted to obtain compensation from such insurer. The state shall compensate the employee only to the extent the employee is not compensated by the insurer.

In cases where the loss, damage or destruction is to a motor vehicle and the employee does not have the benefit of insurance coverage for the motor vehicle, the employee shall not be compensated by the state in an amount in excess of five hundred dollars ($500).

The burden shall be upon the employee to prove the extent of the loss, damage or destruction of personal property and the failure of an insurer to compensate for such loss, damage or destruction. The state shall only be responsible for compensating employees to the extent that such proof is submitted.

Acts 1981, ch. 517, § 1; T.C.A., §9-8-218; Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 19; 1986, ch. 626, § 9; 1988, ch. 850, § 1; 1998, ch. 785, § 1.

9-8-112. Final judgments against state employees.

The board of claims is authorized to pay final judgments for state employees, as defined in § 8-42-101, for any damages, including interest thereon, which are awarded in a final judgment in a civil lawsuit against the employee in a court of competent jurisdiction where it is determined by the board that the incident on which such damages were awarded occurred when the employee was acting in good faith within the scope of such employee's official duty and under apparent lawful authority or orders.

No final judgment or interest thereon shall be paid where the employee's conduct amounted to gross negligence or willful, intentional or malicious conduct.

Any portion of the judgment covered by liability insurance will not be paid.

Settlements or compromises of litigation reached out of court by mutual agreement between the parties may be disallowed by the board if the board determines that the terms of the proposed settlement have no relationship to the employee's liability and the injury or damage caused.

In order for any payment to be made as authorized herein, the employee must have exercised such employee's right to retain counsel in accordance with title 8, chapter 42, to defend such employee in the action filed or must be represented by the attorney general and reporter. No payment shall be made unless the employee shall notify, in writing, the attorney general and reporter of the existence of such action within ten (10) days after process is served personally on the employee. This requirement shall be met by an employee's timely filing of a request for the employment of counsel with the defense counsel commission, and shall not be required where process has been served on the attorney general and reporter.

Any final judgment against an employee whose act or omission gave rise to the claim shall constitute a complete bar to any action, by reason of the same subject matter, against the state of Tennessee. Likewise, any judgment, if permitted or awarded by the state, shall constitute a complete bar to any action, by reason of the same subject matter, against a state employee as defined in § 8-42-101.

This section shall not be construed as a waiver of official or sovereign immunity where the injury arises from the act, or failure to act, of an employee where the act is the type of act for which the employee would be or heretofore has been personally immune from liability nor as a waiver of any other defense or jurisdictional bar available to the employee. Furthermore, this section shall not be construed under any circumstances as making the state an insurer of the aforementioned state employees nor as constituting a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state.

In order for payments to be made as authorized herein, an employee must submit a written request to the board, together with a certified copy of the judgment against the employee, within fifteen (15) days following the entry of the judgment. The board shall act on a request promptly and shall give the employee written notice of its action. The board's decision shall be judicially reviewable by the employee as a final decision in a contested case pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3.

This section applies to final judgments rendered on or after July 1, 1979.

This section shall apply to causes of action arising on or after January 1, 1985, only as set forth in subsection (h).

The board of claims, upon determining that the officer or employee was acting within the scope of the officer's or employee's official duties, shall reimburse the affected officer or employee for actual damages and costs, including attorneys fees, awarded by judgment or settlement up to the limits found in § 9-8-307(e), against state officers and employees for any cause of action arising on or after January 1, 1985, where the state officers' or employees' immunity set forth in § 9-8-307(h) is not sustained. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the board of claims may, in its sole discretion, reduce the reimbursement provided in this subsection (h) if the board finds a circumstance to exist which makes such a reduction proper and just. Such a circumstance may include, but is not limited to, the failure of the officer or employee to fully cooperate in the investigation and defense of the litigation. In cases where the judgment or settlement is in excess of the limits found in § 9-8-307(e), the board of claims may pay any of the amounts in excess of those limits where such reimbursement is found to bear a reasonable relationship to the officer's or employee's liability or the injury or damage caused.

For purposes of this subsection (h), actions deemed to be within the scope of official duties include, but are not limited to, actions taken pursuant to the statutes, policies or procedures of this state, or when the officer or employee had reason to believe that the officer or employee acted pursuant to the statutes, policies or procedures of the state.

Payments may be denied pursuant to this subsection (h) if the officer or employee or the officer's or employee's counsel have not made reasonable efforts to defend or if the officer's or employee's actions were grossly negligent, willful, malicious, criminal or done for personal gain. All other applicable provisions of this section shall apply to this subsection (h). The board may promulgate rules and regulations implementing this subsection (h).

Acts 1982, ch. 717, § 1; 1983, ch. 68, § 1; T.C.A., §9-8-220; Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 19; 1985, ch. 105, § 13; 1985, ch. 322, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 260, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Claims against the state, title 9, ch. 8, parts 3 and 4.

Defense counsel for state employees, §8-42-103.

Employment of private counsel, §8-42-104.